Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 5

Judicial or Trust Sales

35-5-101. Twenty days' notice by publication.

In any sale of land to foreclose a deed of trust, mortgage or other lien securing the payment of money or other thing of value or under judicial orders or process, advertisement of the sale shall be made at least three (3) different times in some newspaper published in the county where the sale is to be made.

The first publication shall be at least twenty (20) days previous to the sale.

This section shall not apply where the amount of indebtedness for the payment of which the property being sold does not amount to more than two hundred dollars ($200), in which event the owner of the property may order that advertisement be made by written notices posted as provided in § 35-5-103, instead of by notices published in a newspaper.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as applying to any notice published in accordance with any contract entered into heretofore, and expressed in a mortgage, deed of trust or other legal instruments.

In any sale of land to foreclose a deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien securing the payment of money or other thing of value or under judicial orders of process, the trustee or other party that sells the property shall send to the debtor and any co-debtor a copy of the notice required in § 35-5-104. The notice shall be sent on or before the first date of publication provided in subsection (b) by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. The notice shall be sent to the following:

If to the debtor, addressed to the debtor at:

The mailing address of the property, if any; and

The last known mailing address of the debtor or any other mailing address of the debtor specifically designated for purposes of receiving notices provided at least thirty (30) days prior to the first publication date in written correspondence or written notice in accordance with the loan agreement from the debtor to the creditor, but only if the last known mailing address of the debtor or other mailing address designated by the debtor is different from the mailing address of the property; and

If to a co-debtor, addressed to the co-debtor at the last known mailing address of the co-debtor or any other mailing address of the co-debtor specifically designated for purposes of receiving notices provided at least thirty (30) days prior to the first publication date in written correspondence or written notice in accordance with the loan agreement from the co-debtor to the creditor, but only if the last known mailing address of the co-debtor or other mailing address designated by the co-debtor is both different from the mailing address of the property and different from the mailing address of the debtor determined as provided in subdivision (e)(1)(B).

Unless postponement or adjournment is contractually prohibited, any sale hereunder may be adjourned and rescheduled one (1) or more times without additional newspaper publication, upon compliance with the following provisions:

The sale must be held within one (1) year of the originally scheduled date;

Each postponement or adjournment must be to a specified date and time, and must be announced at the date, time and location of each scheduled sale date;

If the postponement or adjournment is for more than thirty (30) days, notice of the new date, time, and location must be mailed no less than (10) calendar days prior to the sale date via regular mail to the debtor and co-debtor; and

Notice of the right to postpone or adjourn without additional newspaper publication shall not be required to be published in any newspaper publication.

Code 1858, § 2145 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 1); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 60; Shan., § 3838; mod. Code 1932, § 7793; Acts 1943, ch. 123, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7793; Acts 1957, ch. 41, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-501; Acts 2006, ch. 801, § 10; 2008, ch. 743, § 1; 2011, ch. 505, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 801, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Home Loan Protection Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Advertising sales of land by execution, § 26-5-101.

Application to enjoin sale, title 29, ch. 23, part 2.

Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Court officer purchasing property sold through court, § 39-16-405.

Officer purchasing at own sale, misdemeanor, § 39-16-405.

Power of court to sell land, § 16-1-107.

Registration of decree, § 16-1-109.

Sales on execution, §§ 26-5-101 — 26-5-114.

Sheriff's duty to advertise, § 8-8-201.

Vesting of title by decree, § 16-1-108.

Warranty of title and covenant of seizin, § 16-1-110.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 282.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 895.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, §§ 8, 13; 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 52.

Law Reviews.

Simple Real Estate Foreclosures Made Complex: The Byzantine Tennessee Process (John A. Walker, Jr.), 62 Tenn. L. Rev. 231 (1995).

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

Attorney General Opinions. Minimum requirements for publication and notice to be given to the owner of real property during a foreclosure, OAG 05-095 (6/14/05), 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 97.

The provisions of T.C.A. § 35-5-501 do not apply to delinquent tax sales, OAG 07-135 (9/12/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 135.

35-5-102. Notice in newspaper not required.

If no newspaper is published in the county in which the land is to be sold, the advertisement in a newspaper is dispensed with, unless ordered by court.

Code 1858, § 2147 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 2); Shan., § 3840; Code 1932, § 7795; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-502.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-103. Posting written notices.

Whenever the advertisement cannot be made in a newspaper, the officer shall make publication of the sale for thirty (30) days by written notices posted in at least five (5) of the most public places in the county, one (1) of which shall be the courthouse door, and another in the neighborhood of the defendant; if of realty, in the civil district where the land lies.

Code 1858, § 2148 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 3); Shan., § 3841; Code 1932, § 7796; Acts 1943, ch. 123, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 7796; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-503.

Cross-References. Notice of execution sale, §§ 26-5-101 — 26-5-103.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 895.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 36; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, §§ 8, 13; 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 52.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-104. Contents of advertisement or notice — Contents of deed memorializing sale.

The advertisement or notice shall:

Give the names of the plaintiff and defendant, or parties interested;

Give a concise description of the land; such description shall include a legal description, which means a reference to the deed book and page that contains the complete legal description of the property, and common description, which means, if available, the street address and map and parcel number of the property. In the event no street address exists, a subdivision, lot or tract number may be used. A metes and bounds description may be, but is not required to be, included in the description of the land;

Mention the time and place of sale;

Identify each and every lien or claimed lien of the United States with respect to which 26 U.S.C. § 7425(b) requires notice to be given to the United States in order for the sale of the land thus advertised not to be subject to the lien or claim of lien of the United States;

For every lien or claim of lien of the United States so identified, affirmatively state that the notice required by 26 U.S.C. § 7425(b) to be given to the United States has been timely given;

For every lien or claim of lien of the United States so identified, state that the sale of the land thus advertised will be subject to the right of the United States to redeem the land as provided for in 26 U.S.C. § 7425(d)(1);

Identify each and every lien or claimed lien of the state with respect to which § 67-1-1433(b)(1) requires notice to be given to the state in order for the sale of the land thus advertised not to be subject to the lien or claim of lien of the state;

For every lien or claim of lien of the state so identified, affirmatively state that the notice required by § 67-1-1433(b)(1) to be given to the state has been timely given; and

For every lien or claim of lien of the state so identified, state that the sale of the land thus advertised will be subject to the right of the state to redeem the land as provided for in § 67-1-1433(c)(1); and

For each concise description of land, provide the corresponding names of the parties interested.

The deed memorializing the sale shall, in addition to any other requirements as may now or hereafter exist under the laws of the state with respect to the proper form of deeds, in order that they might qualify for recording in the various offices of registers of counties in this state, whenever subsection (a) has required notice to be given to the United States and/or to this state, state that the land described therein is conveyed subject to the rights of the United States to redeem the land as provided for in 26 U.S.C. § 7425(d)(1) and/or is subject to the right of this state to redeem the land as provided for in § 67-1-1433(c)(1), as appropriate, shall have attached to it, as exhibits, a copy of the notice thus provided to the United States, a copy of the written response of the United States to the notice thus provided, if any, a copy of the notice thus provided to the state, and a copy of the written response of the state to the notice thus provided, if any, as appropriate.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require inclusion of a street address if it does not exist or is not in common use. Also, utilization of the street address, if any, which appears in the records of the assessor of property with respect to the property involved shall be conclusively presumed to be in compliance with this section.

For the purposes of this section, “parties interested” includes, without limitation, the record holders of any mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien that will be extinguished or adversely affected by the sale and which mortgage, deed of trust, or lien, or notice or evidence thereof, was recorded more than ten (10) days prior to the first advertisement or notice in the register's office of the county in which the real property is located. “Parties interested” also includes a person or entity named as nominee or agent of the owner of the obligation that is secured by the deed of trust and that is identifiable from information provided in the deed of trust, which shall include a mailing address or post office box of the nominee or agent.

Code 1858, § 2149 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 1); Shan., § 3842; Code 1932, § 7797; Acts 1982, ch. 801, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-504; Acts 1992, ch. 621, § 1; 1994, ch. 618, § 1; 1999, ch. 66, § 1; 2011, ch. 505, § 1; 2015, ch. 213, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (a)(6) and added the second sentence of (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 213, § 4. July 1, 2015.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 277, 282.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-105. Notice in writing if printer refuses.

If the printer will not make the publication for the rates provided in § 8-21-1301, the officer or person conducting the sale shall make publication by written notices as provided in §§ 35-5-103 and 35-5-104.

Code 1858, § 2151 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 3); Shan., § 3844; Code 1932, § 7799; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-506.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Judicial Sales, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-106. Sale without advertisement is not void.

Should the officer, or other person making the sale, proceed to sell without pursuing the provisions of this chapter, the sale shall not, on that account, be either void or voidable.

Code 1858, § 2152 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 4); Shan., § 3845; Code 1932, § 7800; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-507.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 282.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 741, 895.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, §§ 8, 13.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-107. Effect of noncompliance with chapter.

Any officer, or other person, referenced in § 35-5-106 who fails to comply with this chapter commits a Class C misdemeanor and is, moreover, liable to the party injured by the noncompliance, for all damages resulting from the failure.

Code 1858, § 2153 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 83, § 5); Shan., § 3846; Code 1932, § 7801; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-508; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 59.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-108. Plan of division of land — Sale of portion of land.

At any time before ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) on the day of sale, the defendant or other person whose property is to be sold may deliver to the officer or person making the sale, a plan of division of the lands to be sold, subscribed by the defendant or other person, bearing a date subsequent to the date of advertisement, in which case so much of the land as may be necessary to satisfy the debt and costs, and no more, shall be sold according to the plan furnished. If no such plan is furnished, the land may be sold without division.

Code 1858, § 2154 (deriv. Acts 1799, ch. 14, § 3); Shan., § 3847; Code 1932, § 7802; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-509.

Cross-References. Defendant dividing lands in execution sales, § 26-5-105.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 463.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 59.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-109. Published ending time and published start time for auctions.

The published ending time for auctions conducted under this chapter on an internet-based bidding platform and the published start time for an in-person auction must be between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. (9:00 a.m.) and seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.) of the day fixed in the notice or advertisement. The day fixed may be any day Monday through Saturday, but must not be fixed on a state or federal legal holiday. However, this section does not apply to sales of parcels pursuant to title 67, chapter 5.

Code 1858, § 2155 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 99, § 1); Shan., § 3848; Code 1932, § 7803; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-510; Acts 2014, ch. 912, § 3; 2015, ch. 414, § 1; 2017, ch. 187, § 2; 2019, ch. 471, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the third sentence.

The 2017 amendment substituted “between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. (9:00 a.m.) and seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.)” for “between the hours of ten o'clock a.m. (10:00 a.m.) and four o'clock p.m. (4:00 p.m.)” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section which read: “The sale in all these cases shall be made between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. (9:00 a.m.) and seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.) of the day fixed in the notice or advertisement. The day fixed may be any day Monday through Saturday, but shall not be fixed on a state or federal legal holiday. However, this requirement shall not be applicable to sales of parcels pursuant to title 67, chapter 5.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 414, § 29. May 8, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 187, § 3. April 19, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Hours of sale, § 26-5-104.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 895.

35-5-110. Bidding on land sales may be reopened by clerks — Court's power not abridged.

In all sales of land made under orders, and decrees of the circuit, probate, chancery, appeals and supreme courts where an advance bid of as much as ten percent (10%) of the original bid is made, the clerk, or clerk and master, of the court is empowered, at no additional fee, commission or cost, to accept the advance bid and reopen the biddings on the sale, and to receive additional bids, and to hold the sale open for advance bids to some day by the officer designated, and give the purchaser and the parties, or their attorneys of record, notice of the reopening of the biddings, and to report this action to the court for confirmation without any order or decree of the court authorizing the reopening first being had, unless the court's order or decree for the sale of the land specifically prohibits the acceptance of an advance bid; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed as abridging the rights and jurisdiction of the court to reopen the biddings on such terms as the court may deem right.

Acts 1899, ch. 37, § 1; Shan., § 3848a1; mod. Code 1932, § 7804; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-511; Acts 2014, ch. 930, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 29.

Law Reviews.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

35-5-111. State may bid at execution or judicial sales.

Whenever the state is interested in the proceeds of any execution sale or any judicial sale, to any extent whatsoever, the state, acting through its attorney general and reporter, may bid on and buy in property either real or personal, at that sale, to the same extent as any natural person might do. Any sums due and payable on behalf of the state, as costs of sale or as a part of the purchase price of the property so bid in and paid by the state, shall be paid out of the general fund of the state treasury upon the warrant of the governor.

Acts 1943, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7804.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-512.

35-5-112. Auctioneer services and fee — Manner and method of sale of real property at discretion of court.

Whenever real or personal property is to be sold at public sale under any order or decree of any court in this state, the court, judge or chancellor under whose jurisdiction the sale is to be made has the discretionary authority to secure the services of an auctioneer licensed in this state to conduct the public sale and to fix the auctioneer's fee, the fee to be not more than eight percent (8%) of the sale price on sales of real property and not more than ten percent (10%) of the sale price on sales of personal property, these fees not to include the expenses of sales, and to order the fee to be paid out of the proceeds of the sale.

Whenever real property is sold at a public sale conducted by an auctioneer, the manner and method of sale is at the discretion of the court. As used in this section, “public sale” includes auctions on internet-based bidding platforms, in-person, on-site, or off-site auctions, and other accepted auction methods, so long as the auctions are open for participation by the public at large. The court, in its discretion, may impose additional conditions or procedures upon the sale of property as are reasonably necessary.

If the clerk of the court or clerk and master is also a licensed auctioneer, then the clerk or clerk and master shall receive fees in that person's capacity as clerk, or clerk and master, or special commissioner, and shall not receive any extra fee as a licensed auctioneer.

Acts 1975, ch. 334, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 772, § 1; 1978, ch. 769, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 35-513, 35-514; Acts 2011, ch. 320, § 1; 2015, ch. 414, § 2; 2019, ch. 471, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the second sentence of (b).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “Whenever real property is sold at a public sale conducted by an auctioneer, the sale shall be conducted on the real property to be sold. This subsection (b) shall not be applicable to sales of parcels pursuant to title 67, chapter 5.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 414, § 29. May 8, 2015.

Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

35-5-113. Auction sales in divorce proceedings.

The provisions and procedures of this chapter apply to all auction sales of property ordered by a court pursuant to § 36-4-121, to accomplish the equitable division of property in divorce cases. The court, in its discretion, may impose any additional conditions or procedures upon the sale of property in divorce cases as are reasonably designed to ensure that the property is sold for its fair market value.

Acts 1986, ch. 722, § 1.

35-5-114. Trustee's attendance at foreclosure — Successor trustee.

In any sale of land to foreclose a deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien securing the payment of money or other thing of value, the trustee or person or entity holding a similar position may attend the foreclosure either in person or by an agent. If the trustee attends by an agent, the agent may receive bids and conduct the sale on behalf of the trustee. The trustee shall execute any applicable trustee's deed or similar conveyance instrument. The appointment of an agent by a trustee need not be by written instrument, nor is there any recording required relative to the appointment.

The beneficiary may, unless the deed of trust contains specific language to the contrary, appoint a successor trustee at any time by filing a substitution of trustee for record with the register of deeds of the county in which the property is situated.

The substitute trustee or its delegate shall succeed to all the power, duties, authority and title of the original trustee and any previous successor trustee or delegatee.

In the event the substitution of trustee is not recorded prior to the first date of publication by the substitute trustee, the beneficiary shall include in the substitution of trustee instrument, which shall be recorded prior to the deed evidencing sale, the following statement:

Beneficiary has appointed the substitute trustee prior to the first notice of publication as required by T.C.A. § 35-5-101 and ratifies and confirms all actions taken by the substitute trustee subsequent to the date of substitution and prior to the recording of this substitution.

Once a substitution of trustee instrument containing the statement set forth in subdivision (b)(3)(A) is timely recorded, it shall act as conclusive proof as a matter of law that the substitute trustee has been timely appointed and has acted with authority of the beneficiary.

A substitution of trustee shall be recorded prior to any sale, and no action may be instituted against any person who, acting in good faith without knowledge to the contrary, relies upon the validity of the substitution of trustee or written statements by the beneficiary or substitute trustee as to the authority of the substitute trustee.

If the name of the substitute trustee is not included in the first publication, then, not less than ten (10) business days prior to the sale date, the substitute trustee shall send notice by registered or certified mail to the debtor or any co-debtor, as provided in § 35-5-101, and to any interested parties, giving the name and address of the substitute trustee. If the trustee is not a resident of this state, the notice shall include the name and address of a registered agent of the substitute trustee who is located in the state. Record notice of the mailing provided in this subsection (d) shall be evidenced by the substitute trustee's recordation of an affidavit recorded prior to the deed evidencing the sale or by recitation on the substitute trustee's deed.

Acts 1993, ch. 415, § 1; 2006, ch. 951, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section was originally designated as § 35-5-124, but has been redesignated as § 35-5-114.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

35-5-115. Discovery proceedings for nonresidents.

IF a nonresident creditor holds indebtedness secured by residential real property that is located in this state and owned by a state resident, OR

IF a nonresident trustee or agent is involved in foreclosure proceedings relative to residential real property that is located in this state and owned by a resident,

THEN all discovery proceedings, including, but not limited to, the production of requested documents and the deposition of witnesses, shall be conducted in the county in which the residential real estate is located or in which the litigation is pending.

The court in which such litigation is pending may make orders consistent with the purposes of this section to prevent undue burden on any party.

Acts 2003, ch. 174, § 1.

35-5-116. Trustee as necessary party.

Any trustee named in a suit or proceeding, as related to a sale of real property under a trust deed or mortgage, may plead in the answer that the trustee is not a necessary party by a verified denial, stating the basis for the trustee's reasonable belief that the trustee was named as a party solely in the capacity as a trustee under a deed of trust, contract lien, or security instrument.

Within thirty (30) days after the filing of the trustee's verified denial, a verified response is due from all parties to the suit or proceeding setting forth all matters, whether in law or fact, that rebut the trustee's verified denial.

If a party has no objection or fails to file a timely verified response to the trustee's verified denial, the trustee shall be dismissed from the suit or proceeding without prejudice.

If a respondent files a timely verified response to the trustee's verified denial, the matter shall be set for hearing. The court shall dismiss the trustee from the suit or proceeding without prejudice, if the court determines that the trustee is not a necessary party.

A dismissal of the trustee pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) shall not prejudice a party's right to seek injunctive relief to prevent the trustee from proceeding with a foreclosure sale.

A trustee shall not be liable for any good faith error resulting from reliance on any information in law or fact provided by the borrower or secured party or their respective attorney, agent, or representative or other third party.

Acts 2006, ch. 811, § 1.

35-5-117. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 834, § 1; 2011, ch. 122, §§ 1-4; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 122, § 4, effective January 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former section 35-5-117, concerned legal notices of foreclosure.

35-5-118. Deficiency judgment sufficient to fully satisfy indebtedness on real property after trustee's or foreclosure sale.

In an action brought by a creditor to recover a balance still owing on an indebtedness after a trustee's or foreclosure sale of real property secured by a deed of trust or mortgage, the creditor shall be entitled to a deficiency judgment in an amount sufficient to satisfy fully the indebtedness.

In all such actions, absent a showing of fraud, collusion, misconduct, or irregularity in the sale process, the deficiency judgment shall be for the total amount of indebtedness prior to the sale plus the costs of the foreclosure and sale, less the fair market value of the property at the time of the sale. The creditor shall be entitled to a rebuttable prima facie presumption that the sale price of the property is equal to the fair market value of the property at the time of the sale.

To overcome the presumption set forth in subsection (b), the debtor must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the property sold for an amount materially less than the fair market value of property at the time of the foreclosure sale. If the debtor overcomes the presumption, the deficiency shall be the total amount of the indebtedness prior to the sale plus the costs of the foreclosure and sale, less the fair market value of the property at the time of the sale as determined by the court.

Any action for a deficiency judgment under this section shall be brought not later than the earlier of:

Two (2) years after the date of the trustee's or foreclosure sale, exclusive of any period of time in which a petition for bankruptcy is pending; or

The time for enforcing the indebtedness as provided for under §§ 28-1-102 and 28-2-111.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as limiting a person entitled to bring such action from electing to sue on an indebtedness in lieu of, prior to, or contemporaneously with enforcement of a deed of trust or mortgage.

Acts 2010, ch. 1001, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 1001, § 1 purported to enact new § 35-5-117; however, § 35-5-117 was previously enacted by Acts 2010, ch. 834, and the section was redesignated as § 35-5-118 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1001, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted § 35-5-118, shall apply to all trustee or foreclosure sales of real property secured by a deed of trust for which the first foreclosure publication is given on or after September 1, 2010.

35-5-119. Applicability of §§ 35-5-101(e), 35-5-104(a)(4) and (5), and 35-5-104(b).

The requirements of §§ 35-5-101(e), 35-5-104(a)(4) and (5), and 35-5-104(b) shall not be applicable to sales of parcels pursuant to title 67, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 414, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 414, § 29. May 8, 2015.